Maryland, session 2026, SB0240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 27. OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
19–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADVISORY COUNCIL” MEANS THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY
STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY COUNCIL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0240*

SENATE BILL 240
(C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
19–2702.
(A) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY STAKEHOLDER
ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(B) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FEEDBACK TO THE OFFICE FROM STAKEHOLDERS
REGARDING MAINTAINING OVERSIGHT OF HEALTH CARE FACILITIES; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE SECRETARY IF THE OFFICE IS REPORTED
NEGLIGENT BY THE ADVISORY COUNCIL IN PROVIDING OVERSIGHT OF HEALTH
CARE FACILITIES.
(C) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF AGING, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(5) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE MARYLAND ATTORNEY
GENERAL’S HEALTH EDUCATION AND ADVOCACY UNIT, DESIGNATED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(6) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY:
(I) TWO FRONTLINE HOSPITAL WORKERS;
(II) TWO NURSING HOME WORKERS;
(III) TWO NURSING HOME RESIDENTS OR INDIVIDUALS WITH A
FAMILY MEMBER RESIDING IN A NURSING HOME;

SENATE BILL 240 3
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE LONG–TERM CARE
INDUSTRY;
(V) ONE MEMBER OF AN ADVOCACY GROUP FOR THE
INTELLECTUALLY AND DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED; AND
(VI) ONE MEMBER OF AN ADVOCACY GROUP FOR BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH;
(7) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND HOSPITAL
ASSOCIATION, DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE ASSOCIATION; AND
(8) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS DESIGNATED BY THE ORGANIZATION
THE INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTS:
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MEDCHI, THE MARYLAND
STATE MEDICAL SOCIETY;
(II) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF 1199 SEIU UNITED
HEALTHCARE WORKERS EAST;
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND CHAPTER OF
AARP;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND STATE
CONFERENCE NAACP;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF MARYLAND CASA;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF DISABILITY RIGHTS MARYLAND;
AND
(VII) ONE MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND CONTINUING CARE
RESIDENTS’ ASSOCIATION.
(D) (1) (I) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL IS 2
YEARS.
(II) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER SHALL CONTINUE TO
SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(2) (I) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE SHALL SELECT THE CHAIR
OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.

SENATE BILL 240
(II) THE TERM OF THE CHAIR IS 2 YEARS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL MAY NOT RECEIVE
COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(G) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL
HOLD A VIRTUAL PUBLIC MEETING ONCE EVERY 6 MONTHS.
(2) (I) EACH PUBLIC MEETING OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:
1. BE STREAMED LIVE THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE; AND
2. INCLUDE A DESIGNATED OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC
COMMENT.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A PUBLIC MEETING OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL, THE SUMMARY COMPILED UNDER SUBSECTION (H)(2) OF THIS
SECTION AND MEETING MINUTES SHALL BE POSTED ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
(H) (1) AT EACH PUBLIC MEETING OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL, THE
OFFICE SHALL REPORT DATA FROM THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6–MONTH
PERIOD REGARDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF:
1. HOSPITALS ACTIVELY MONITORED;
2. NURSING HOMES INSPECTED;
3. COMPLAINTS RECEIVED FROM HOSPITAL PATIENTS
AND LONG–TERM CARE RESIDENTS; AND
4. CODE VIOLATIONS IDENTIFIED IN EACH FACILITY;
(II) THE AVERAGE LENGTH OF TIME FOR THE OFFICE TO
RESPOND TO EACH COMPLAINT; AND

SENATE BILL 240 5
(III) THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RESOLVED BY THE OFFICE.
(2) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL:
(I) 1. REVIEW THE DATA REPORTS PROVIDED BY THE
OFFICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
2. COMPILE FEEDBACK FROM EACH MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL INTO A SUMMARY REPORT WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE REPORT
FROM THE OFFICE; AND
(II) DEVELOP RECOMMENDATIONS TO CONTINUE
IMPROVEMENT IN NURSING HOME AND HOSPITAL CARE QUALITY.
(I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
non–ex officio members of the Office of Health Care Quality Stakeholder Advisory Council
shall expire as follows:
(1) ten members in 2027; and
(2) ten members in 2028.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.